Hawaii statutes.
[§147-112] Cooperative agreements and
contracts to provide auditing and certification services. The department
may enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Department of
Agriculture or other agreements and contracts with private parties or other
governmental agencies for the purposes of:

(1) Auditing and certifying that applicants are
following good agricultural, handling, processing, and manufacturing practices;
and

(2) Maintaining food security and product
traceability. [L 2003, c 49, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next